North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-46 Tax Concessions Applicable to Persons in Armed Forces [Repealed]

[Omitted and Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 468, § 2]

57-46-01.
Military income exempt from the income tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 468, § 2.

57-46-01.1.
Extension of time for filing income tax returns and payment of income tax. [Repealed]

Omitted.

Note.

Not repealed but omitted as executed. This section can be found at S.L. 1967, ch. 464, § 1; 1969, ch. 532, § 1; 1971, ch. 536, § 6.

57-46-02.
Extension of time for payment of income tax. [Repealed]

Omitted.

Note.

Not repealed but omitted as a statute not of a general and permanent nature. This section can be found as S.L. 1943, ch. 267, § 2.

57-46-03.
Extension of time for filing income tax returns. [Repealed]

Omitted.

Note.

Not repealed but omitted as a statute not of a general and permanent nature. This section can be found as S.L. 1943, ch. 267, § 3.

57-46-04.
Income tax — Payment in installments. [Repealed]

Omitted.

Note.

Not repealed but omitted as a statute not of a general and permanent nature. This section can be found as S.L. 1943, ch. 267, § 4.

57-46-05.
Postponement of real and personal taxes. [Repealed]

Omitted.

Note.

Not repealed but omitted as a statute not of a general and permanent nature. This section can be found as S.L. 1943, ch. 267, § 5.

57-46-06.
Tax delinquency. [Repealed]

Omitted.

Note.

Not repealed but omitted as a statute not of a general and permanent nature. This section can be found as S.L. 1943, ch. 267, § 6.

57-46-07.
Taxes postponed and exempted. [Repealed]

Omitted.

Note.

Not repealed but omitted as a statute not of a general and permanent nature. This section can be found as S.L. 1943, ch. 267, § 7.

57-46-08.
Cessation of hostilities defined. [Repealed]

Omitted.

Note.

Not repealed but omitted as a statute not of a general and permanent nature. This section can be found as S.L. 1943, ch. 267, § 8.